Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.200

Program of basic education.

(1) The program of basic education established under this chapter is deemed by the legislature to comply with the requirements of Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution, which states that "It is the paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education of all children residing within its borders, without distinction or preference on account of race, color, caste, or sex," and is adopted pursuant to Article IX, section 2 of the state Constitution, which states that "The legislature shall provide for a general and uniform system of public schools."

(2) The legislature defines the program of basic education under this chapter as that which is necessary to provide the opportunity to develop the knowledge and skills necessary to meet the state-established high school graduation requirements that are intended to allow students to have the opportunity to graduate with a meaningful diploma that prepares them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. Basic education by necessity is an evolving program of instruction intended to reflect the changing educational opportunities that are needed to equip students for their role as productive citizens and includes the following:

(a) The instructional program of basic education the minimum components of which are described in RCW 28A.150.220;

(b) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.190 RCW for students in residential schools as defined by RCW 28A.190.005 and for juveniles in detention facilities as identified by RCW 28A.190.010;

(c) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.193 RCW for individuals under the age of eighteen who are incarcerated in adult correctional facilities;

(d) Transportation and transportation services to and from school for eligible students as provided under RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180; and

(e) Statewide salary allocations necessary to hire and retain qualified staff for the state's statutory program of basic education.

[ 2021 c 164 s 2; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 401; 2009 c 548 s 101; 1990 c 33 s 104; 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.750.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: "Sections 401 through 413 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect September 1, 2017." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 414.]

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: "Sections 101 through 110 and 701 through 710 of this act take effect September 1, 2011." [ 2009 c 548 s 804.]

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 359: "This 1977 amendatory act shall take effect September 1, 1978." [ 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 22.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 359: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 21.]